Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.310

Law against discrimination applicable to districts' employment practices.

The provisions of chapter 49.60 RCW as now or hereafter amended shall be applicable to the employment of any certificated or classified employee by any school district organized in this state.

[ 1997 c 13 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.050. Prior: (i) 1937 c 52 s 1; RRS s 4693-1. Formerly RCW 28.02.050. (ii) 1937 c 52 s 2; RRS s 4693-2. Formerly RCW 28A.02.050, 28.02.051.]